Massachusetts, session 194th, S2317.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 1. Section 139 of Chapter 164 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the words “applicable rate” the following:-
“(3) A distribution company shall provide payment to a customer for a credit under
Section 139(a)(1) of this Chapter provided that such credit has been carried forward for six
months or more. For the purpose of determining the age of a credit, a distribution company shall
apply any applicable costs against the most recent credit issued by the distribution company. A
distribution company customer eligible for payment under this section may opt to defer payment.
(4) A distribution company shall provide payment to a customer for any outstanding
credit under Section 139(a)(1) of this Chapter within 30 days of the customer closing the account
with the distribution company.
(5) Payments received by a distribution company customer pursuant to Section 139(a)(3)
and Section 139(a)(4) of this Chapter shall not be considered to be a credit, rebate,
of 2

environmental attribute, renewable energy credit, or other payment or offset that may be
construed to be attributable to a renewable energy system.
Section 2. The department shall promulgate regulations pursuant to this subsection
including, but not limited to, a schedule for payments at least once annually; method of payment
including the option for a distribution company customer to receive an electronic transfer of
funds; notice to a distribution company customer of payment eligibility; and process for deferral
of payments.”
of 2